New Jersey, session 222, A908.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Each hospital and nursing home licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) shall make interpreter services for the deaf and hard of hearing available to patients 24 hours per day, seven days per week.  Interpreter services shall include, at minimum, interpreter services provided through electronic means including, but not limited to, video remote interpreting services and artificial intelligence-assisted interpreting services, as approved by the Commissioner of Health. 2.  This act shall take effect 180 days after the date of enactment.